Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3. Sale of Light Wine, Beer, and Other Alcoholic Beverages
§ 67-3-37.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; enforcement.

It shall be the duty of the county prosecuting attorney or the district attorney, as the case may be, to file complaints as provided in Section 67-3-31 and to prosecute diligently and without delay all complaints filed by him.

It shall be the duty of all peace officers, within their jurisdiction, and all enforcement officers of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue to enforce the provisions of Section 67-3-53 and they shall frequently visit all licensed premises within their jurisdiction to determine whether such permittees are complying with the laws. They shall promptly investigate all complaints made to them by any citizen relative to any alleged violations of such section within their jurisdiction. When any peace officer or enforcement officer of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division has knowledge of a violation of such section committed by a permittee within his jurisdiction, it shall be his duty forthwith to file an affidavit with the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney requesting that a complaint be filed for the revocation or suspension of the permit of the permittee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1997, ch. 558, § 4; reenacted and amended, 1998, ch. 520, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 570, § 8; Laws, 2003, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 462, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 379, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 67-3-39.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; jurisdiction of courts is not exclusive.

The jurisdiction conferred upon the circuit and county courts to hear and determine complaints for the revocation or suspension of permits shall not be exclusive and any authority conferred on the commissioner to revoke or suspend licenses shall remain in full force and effect, and the commissioner shall have authority to revoke or suspend permits for a violation of Section 67-3-53 in the manner provided in subsection (2) of Section 67-3-29 for the revocation of permits. However, when a complaint is filed with the court any proceedings which may then be pending before the commissioner against the same permittee on the same charges shall abate and no proceedings for the revocation or suspension of a permit for a violation of the provisions of Section 67-3-53 shall be filed with the commissioner when proceedings are pending before the court against the permittee on the same charges. The revocation or suspension of a permittee’s state permit by the court or by the commissioner shall automatically revoke or suspend any municipal license or permit held by such person. The revocation or suspension of a permittee’s permit shall be in addition to and not in lieu of or limitation of any other penalty imposed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4.

§ 67-3-41.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; sections are cumulative.

Sections 67-3-31 through 67-3-41 and Section 67-3-53 are declared to be cumulative, amendatory, and supplemental to any and all other acts and laws of this state pertaining to the governing of the sale and distribution of light wines and beers as contained in Sections 27-71-301 through 27-71-347, Mississippi Code of 1972, and Sections 67-3-17, 67-3-23, 67-3-27, 67-3-29(2), 67-3-55, and 67-3-57.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4.

§ 67-3-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1973, ch. 467, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1973).

[Codes, 1942, § 10223.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 326]

§ 67-3-45.
Loans and extension of credit to retailers prohibited; brewpub exemption.

No manufacturer, distributor or wholesale dealer to whom or to which this chapter applies shall:

Make any loan, directly or indirectly, or furnish any fixtures of any kind, directly or indirectly, to any retail dealer in light wines and/or beer;

Have any interest, direct or indirect, in the business of or in the furnishings or fixtures or in the premises used by any such retail dealer in connection with his or its business;

Have any lien on any such property of any such retail dealer; or

Sell light wines and/or beer to any such retail dealer on credit.

This section shall not apply to a brewpub licensed pursuant to Article 3, Chapter 71, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10214; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1966, ch. 656, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 67-3-46.
Manufacturers of light wines or beer prohibited from acting as wholesalers or distributors.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section apply to the following entities:

Any person engaged in the business of brewing or manufacturing beer or in the business of manufacturing or producing light wines;

An officer, director, agent or employee of an entity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

An affiliate of an entity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, regardless of whether the affiliation is corporate or by management, direction or control.

No entity named in subsection (1) of this section may have any interest in the license, business, assets or corporate stock of a wholesaler or distributor to whom this chapter applies, except a security interest granted to the entity of the type provided for the uniform commercial code in products sold to a wholesaler or distributor until the full purchase price has been paid therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 67-3-47.
Manufacturer of beer operating brewery permitted to provide limited amounts of beer on premises for tasting or sampling subject to certain conditions.

A person having a permit to manufacture or brew beer under this chapter and who operates a brewery may offer and provide limited amounts of beer on the premises of the brewery for the purpose of tasting or sampling, subject to the following conditions:

The beer provided for tasting or sampling must be manufactured in the State of Mississippi by the holder of the permit;

The beer may be provided only to persons on the premises of the brewery at no cost and for consumption on the premises of the brewery;

The beer may be provided for tasting or sampling between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. on the same day and only in conjunction with a structured tour of the brewery and related facilities which must include the entire manufacturing and brewing processes and methods used at the brewery;

No one under twenty-one (21) years of age may participate in the tasting or sampling, and a sign indicating that prohibition shall be placed in a visible location at the entrance to the area where the tasting or sampling will be conducted;

An individual size sample of beer shall not exceed six (6) ounces, and no more than six (6) samples of beer may be provided to an individual within a twenty-four-hour period; and

The holder of the license operating the brewery shall keep an accurate accounting of the various beers provided and consumed as samples.

For the purposes of this section, the term ‘brewery‘ means and has the same definition as that term has in 26 USCS 5402.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 569, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-48.
Retail sale of light wine or beer produced by small craft brewery.

A small craft brewery may sell at retail light wine or beer produced at its brewery for consumption on the premises of the brewery and consumption off the premises of the brewery if the sales are made on the premises of the brewery and the light wine or beer products offered for sale are also made available for sale to wholesalers.

A small craft brewery shall not sell at retail more than ten percent (10%) of the light wine or beer produced annually at its brewery or more than one thousand five hundred (1,500) barrels of light wine or beer produced at the brewery annually, whichever is the lesser amount. For purposes of this subsection, contract-brewed beer shall not be included in the amount of beer produced annually at the brewery. The light wine or beer must be sold at a price approximating retail prices generally charged for identical beverages in the county where the brewery is located.

A small craft brewery shall not make retail sales of more than five hundred seventy-six (576) ounces, in the aggregate, of light wine or beer to any one (1) individual for consumption off the premises of the brewery within a twenty-four-hour period.

The limits on sales provided for in this subsection shall not apply to beer provided pursuant to Section 67-3-47.

A small craft brewery shall take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that light wine or beer products sold for consumption off the premises of the brewery are being sold for personal use and not for resale and are not being sold to anyone holding a retail permit for the purpose of resale in their establishment.

A small craft brewery shall not make retail sales of contract-brewed beer.

A small craft brewery shall not mail or ship light wine or beer to a consumer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 1, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-48.1.
Operation of small craft brewery acquired by or acquiring manufacturer of light wine or beer not meeting definition of small craft brewery.

In the event a small craft brewery is acquired by an entity that manufactures light wine or beer that does not fall within the definition of the term “small craft brewery,” the entity that acquired the small craft brewery may continue to operate the brewery as a small craft brewery for as long as the acquired facility meets the definition of the term “small craft brewery”; however, the limit in Section 67-3-3 on the amount of barrels of light wine or beer that a small craft brewery may produce shall not apply to light wine or beer that is not produced by the acquired small craft brewery.

In the event a small craft brewery acquires an entity that manufactures light wine or beer that does not fall within the definition of the term “small craft brewery,” the small craft brewery that acquired the entity may continue to operate as a small craft brewery for as long as the brewery meets the definition of the term “small craft brewery.”The light wine or beer produced by the entity that is acquired by a small craft brewery shall not apply to the limit in Section 67-3-3 on the amount of light wine or beer that the small craft brewery may produce.

A small craft brewery described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may continue to sell at retail brands the small craft brewery produces on its premises at all locations at which it was selling the brands at retail at the time of the acquisition; however, the small craft brewery may not sell at retail brands produced by the entity that acquired it or by the entity it acquires, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-49.
Manufacture, sale or storage of light wine with alcoholic content of more than 5% or beer with alcoholic content of more than 8% prohibited; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, it shall be unlawful for any brewer or manufacturer or distributor or wholesale dealer of or in light wines and/or beer to manufacture or knowingly bring upon his premises or keep thereon any wine of an alcoholic content of more than five percent (5%) by weight and beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight, or any distilled spirits of any alcoholic content whatsoever. Any person that shall add to or mix with any beer or light wine any alcoholic or other liquid, or any alcohol cube or cubes, or any other ingredient or ingredients that will increase or tend to increase the alcoholic content of such liquor, or any person that shall knowingly offer for sale any liquor so treated, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as hereinafter provided in this chapter. The commissioner shall take any action he considers necessary to ensure that light wine and/or beer manufactured at a brewpub complies with the provisions of this section.

A brewer or manufacturer of light wine or beer may manufacture and keep upon his premises beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if the beer is manufactured for legal sale in another state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10219; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 11; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-51.
Sales from other than original containers prohibited; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, or offer to sell, or keep for sale any bottled beer or bottled light wine except the same be in the original bottle or in the original package containing bottles, each of which bottles shall bear the original label and the full name of the brewer or manufacturer of the contents of such bottle, both on the label and on the cap or cork of such bottle in the case of beer, and on the label only in the case of light wine.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, or offer for sale, or keep for sale any beer or light wine in the original package or packages unless each such original package (whether barrel or other container, and whether containing liquor in bottles or otherwise) shall have plainly stamped on the container or label for each such container the full name of the manufacturer of the liquor therein contained.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell on draught any beer or light wine except the same be drawn from the original barrel or other container, which such container shall have plainly stamped on each end thereof the full name of the manufacturer of such liquor.

This section shall not apply to beer offered and provided on the premises of a brewery for the purpose of tasting or sampling as authorized in Section 67-3-47.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10220; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1987, ch. 355, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 569, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-52.
Sale of beer or light wine obtained outside state.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding a permit authorizing the sale of beer or light wine at retail to obtain such beer or light wine from any source outside of the State of Mississippi. Any person who violates the provisions of this section, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. Any person convicted of violating this section, or any rules or regulations promulgated by the commissioner with regard to the unlawful acts described in this section, shall forfeit his permit. Any person whose permit has been forfeited pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for a permit issued by the commissioner for a period of five (5) years after the date of such forfeiture. In addition, no permit shall be issued for the same location, for which an offender has forfeited a permit pursuant to this section, to a spouse, offspring or sibling of the offender when to do so would circumvent the purposes of this section. The commissioner may assess a retailer who violates this section the amount of excise taxes due on the unlawfully imported beer or light wine, together with a penalty in the amount of four (4) times the state excise taxes due or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per case, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 435, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 67-3-53.
Unlawful acts.

In addition to any act declared to be unlawful by this chapter, or by Sections 27-71-301 through 27-71-347, and Sections 67-3-17, 67-3-27, 67-3-29 and 67-3-57, it shall be unlawful for the holder of a permit authorizing the sale of beer or light wine at retail or a small craft brewery selling light wine or beer at retail pursuant to Section 67-3-48 or for the employee of the holder of such a permit or the employee of such a brewery:

To sell or give to be consumed in or upon any licensed premises or in or upon the premises of a small craft brewery any beer or light wine between the hours of midnight and seven o’clock the following morning or during any time the licensed premises may be required to be closed by municipal ordinance or order of the board of supervisors; however, in areas where the sale of alcoholic beverages is legal under the provisions of the Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law and the hours for selling those alcoholic beverages have been extended beyond midnight for on-premises permittees under Section 67-1-37, the hours for selling beer or light wines are likewise extended in areas where the sale of beer and light wines is legal in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

To sell, give or furnish any beer or light wine to any person visibly or noticeably intoxicated, or to any habitual drunkard, or to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

To permit in the premises any lewd, immoral or improper entertainment, conduct or practices.

To permit loud, boisterous or disorderly conduct of any kind upon the premises or to permit the use of loud musical instruments if either or any of the same may disturb the peace and quietude of the community in which the business is located.

To permit persons of ill repute, known criminals, prostitutes or minors to frequent the licensed premises or the premises of the small craft brewery, except minors accompanied by parents or guardians, or under proper supervision.

To permit or suffer illegal gambling or the operation of illegal games of chance upon the licensed premises or the premises of the small craft brewery.

To receive, possess or sell on the licensed premises or, except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, on the premises of the small craft brewery any beverage of any kind or character containing more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight except any beer containing not more than eight percent (8%) of alcohol by weight, unless the licensee also possesses an on-premises or manufacturer’s permit under the Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law.

To accept as full or partial payment for any product any coupons that are redeemed directly or indirectly from a manufacturer, wholesaler or distributor of light wine or beer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1974, ch. 568; Laws, 1985, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 368, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 10; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 19; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 11; Laws, 2012, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-54.
Exemption for person over age 18 but less than 21; parental consent; military personnel; employee of establishment licensed to sell light wine or beer.

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but under the age of twenty-one (21) years may possess and consume light wine or beer with the consent of his parent or legal guardian in the presence of his parent or legal guardian, and it shall not be unlawful for the parent, legal guardian or spouse of such person to furnish light wine or beer to such person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age.

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and who is serving in the armed services of the United States may lawfully possess and consume light wine or beer on military property where the consumption of light wine or beer is allowed.

A person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not be deemed to unlawfully possess or furnish light wine or beer, if in the scope of his employment such person:

Clears or buses tables that have glasses or other containers that contain or did contain light wine or beer;

Waits on tables by taking orders for light wine or beer; or

Stocks, bags or otherwise handles purchases of light wine or beer at a store.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 431, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 67-3-55.
Possession or sale of light wine or beer not purchased from licensed or authorized manufacturer or wholesaler prohibited; brewpub exemption; breweries providing beer on premises for tasting or sampling exemption.

It shall be unlawful for any retailer to possess for purpose of sale, to sell, or to offer to sell any light wine or beer which was not purchased from a wholesaler in this state who has a permit to sell such light wine or beer, except for beer or light wine that was brewed on the premises of the retailer who holds a permit as a brewpub pursuant to Article 3, Chapter 71, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

It shall be unlawful for any wholesaler to possess for purpose of sale, to sell, or to offer to sell any light wine or beer which was not purchased from a manufacturer or importer of a foreign manufacturer authorized to sell such light wine or beer in this state.

This section shall not apply to:

Beer offered and provided on the premises of a brewery for the purpose of tasting or sampling as authorized in Section 67-3-47; or

Light wine or beer sold on the premises of a small craft brewery as authorized in Section 67-3-48.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10246; Laws, 1934, ch. 127; Laws, 1973, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 342, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 12; Laws, 2012, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-57.
Possession or sale of light wine or beer before permit secured or during time of revocation or suspension prohibited; seizure of light wine or beer for violation of section.

It shall be unlawful for any retailer to possess, sell or offer to sell, or to possess for purpose of sale, any light wine or beer at his place of business before securing a permit required by this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, sell or offer to sell any light wine or beer at his place of business after revocation of his permit or to purchase, to sell or offer to sell any light wine or beer during the period of suspension of his permit.

Any light wine or beer found in possession of, or sold by, a person in violation of this section shall be seized and disposed of in the manner provided for in Section 67-1-18.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10246; Laws, 1934, ch. 127; Laws, 1973, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 337, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 499, § 11; Laws, 2000, ch. 435, § 10; Laws, 2015, ch. 438, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2015).

§ 67-3-59.
Penalty for sales to persons not holding permits and sales of untaxed wine or beer; notice; disposition of proceeds.

Except as provided in this subsection, sales by wholesalers, distributors or manufacturers to persons who do not hold valid permits are unlawful; and any wholesaler, distributor or manufacturer making such sales, or who sells any beer or light wine on which the tax provided by law has not been paid, shall, in addition to any other fines, penalties and forfeitures, be subject to a penalty of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each sale. If all other applicable taxes are paid, this penalty will not apply to the following: sales to employees of the wholesaler; sales to nonprofit charitable and civic organizations for special fund-raising events provided that the beer or light wine is not resold; sales to affiliated member associations.

The commissioner may assess the penalty by giving notice by mail, demanding payment within thirty (30) days from date of delivery of the notice.

The proceeds of all penalties shall be deposited by the commissioner with the other monies collected by him and shall be disposed of as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10217; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1978, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 368, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 499, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 67-3-61.
Common carriers shall furnish commissioner with duplicate bills of lading; penalty.

Every railroad company, express company, aeroplane company, motor transportation company, steamboat company, or other transportation company, or any person that shall transport into, from place to place within, or out of this state any light wines or beer, whether brewed or manufactured within this state or outside of this state, when requested by the commissioner, shall furnish him with a duplicate of the bill of lading covering the receipt for such liquor, showing the name of the brewer or manufacturer or distributor, and the name and address of the consignor and of the consignee, and the date when and place where received, and the destination and the quantity of such liquor received from the manufacturer or brewer or other consignor for shipment from any point within or without this state to any point within this state.

Any such company or person so transporting any such liquor that shall fail to comply with the requirements of this section, shall forfeit and pay to the State of Mississippi the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each such failure, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to sue in his own name, on the relation and for the use of the State of Mississippi, for such recovery.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10218; Laws, 1934, ch. 171.

§ 67-3-63.
Records.

The commissioner shall cause a record to be kept of the names and places of business of all persons engaged in the brewing of beer, of all persons engaged in the manufacture of light wines, and of all persons engaged in the sale of light wines and/or beer, whether at retail or otherwise. He shall also cause a record to be kept of all beer and light wines (and of the amount thereof) brewed or manufactured by each brewery or winery, and of all such liquors (and of the amount thereof) sold by each brewery or winery, with the names and business addresses of the purchasers, and of all such liquors (and of the amount thereof) sold by every dealer other than a brewer or manufacturer, and in the case of sales by dealers other than retail dealers, of the names and business addresses of the purchasers.

The commissioner shall cause a record to be kept of all expenses incurred in the collection of such data.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10221; Laws, 1934, ch. 171.

§ 67-3-65.
Powers of local governments.

Municipalities may enforce such proper rules and regulations for fixing zones and territories, prescribing hours of opening and of closing, and for such other measures as will promote public health, morals, and safety, as they may by ordinance provide. The board of supervisors of any county may make such rules and regulations as to territory outside of municipalities as are herein provided for municipalities.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the governing body of any municipality from designating what territory surrounding churches and schools in said municipalities, and the board of supervisors of any county from designating what territory surrounding churches and schools outside of any municipality, in which light wines and beer shall not be sold or consumed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10224, 10228; Laws, 1934, ch. 171.

§ 67-3-67.
Transportation of light wines and beer not to be interfered with.

No county or any officer or agent thereof, nor any other officer, agent, or person, shall interfere with or impede the passage through such county of any light wine or beer moving in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of Section 67-9-1 and which in transit to or from any county of this state wherein the traffic in light wines and beer is not prohibited, any county prohibition of such traffic to the contrary notwithstanding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10225; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 67-3-69.
Penalty.

Except as to Sections 67-3-17, 67-3-23, 67-3-27, 67-3-55 and 67-3-57, any violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation of the commissioner, shall be a misdemeanor and, where the punishment therefor is not elsewhere prescribed in this section, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court. If any person so convicted shall be the holder of any permit or license issued by the commissioner under authority of this chapter, the permit or license shall from and after the date of such conviction be void and the holder thereof shall not thereafter, for a period of one (1) year from the date of such conviction, be entitled to any permit or license for any purpose authorized by this chapter. Upon conviction of the holder of any permit or license, the appropriate law enforcement officer shall seize the permit or license and transmit it to the commissioner.

Any person who shall violate any provision of Section 67-3-17, 67-3-23, 67-3-27 or 67-3-55 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

Any person who shall violate any provision of Section 67-3-57 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by both, in the discretion of the court. Any person convicted of violating any provision of the sections referred to in this subsection shall forfeit his permit, and shall not thereafter be permitted to engage in any business taxable under the provisions of Sections 27-71-301 through 27-71-347.

If the holder of a permit, or the employee of the holder of a permit, shall be convicted of selling any beer or wine to anyone who is visibly intoxicated from the licensed premises or to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years from the licensed premises in violation of Section 67-3-53(b), then, in addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the commissioner may impose the following penalties against the holder of a permit:

For the first offense on the licensed premises, by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and/or suspension of the permit for not more than three (3) months.

For a second offense occurring on the licensed premises within twelve (12) months of the first offense, by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) and/or suspension of the permit for not more than six (6) months.

For a third offense occurring on the licensed premises within twelve (12) months of the first, by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and/or suspension or revocation of the permit to sell beer or light wine.

For a fourth or subsequent offense occurring on the licensed premises within twelve (12) months of the first, by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and/or suspension or revocation of the permit to sell beer or light wine.

A person who sells any beer or wine to a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall not be guilty of a violation of Section 67-3-53(b) if the person under the age of twenty-one (21) years represents himself to be twenty-one (21) years of age or older by displaying an apparently valid Mississippi driver’s license containing a physical description consistent with his appearance or by displaying some other apparently valid identification document containing a picture and physical description consistent with his appearance for the purpose of inducing the person to sell beer or wine to him.

If the holder of a permit to operate a brewpub is convicted of violating the provisions of Section 67-3-22(3), then, in addition to any other provision provided for by law, the holder of the permit shall be punished as follows:

For the first offense, the holder of a permit to operate a brewpub may be fined in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

For a second offense occurring within twelve (12) months of the first offense, the holder of a permit to operate a brewpub may be fined an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

For a third or subsequent offense occurring within twelve (12) months of the first offense, the holder of a permit to operate a brewpub may be fined an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and the permit to operate a brewpub shall be suspended for thirty (30) days.

If a small craft brewery is convicted of violating the provisions of Section 67-3-48, then, in addition to any other provision provided for by law, the small craft brewery shall be punished as follows:

For the first offense, the small craft brewery may be fined in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

For a second offense occurring within twelve (12) months of the first offense, the small craft brewery may be fined an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

For a third or subsequent offense occurring within twelve (12) months of the first offense, the small craft brewery may be fined an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and the permit to operate as a manufacturer shall be suspended for thirty (30) days.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10226, 10264; Laws, 1934, chs. 127, 171; Laws, 1985, ch 431, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 499, § 12; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 13; Laws, 2000, ch. 435, § 11; Laws, 2005, ch. 462, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-70.
Purchase of light wine or beer by person under age of 21; penalties; expungement of conviction.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 67-3-54, any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who purchases or possesses any light wine or beer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and a sentence to not more than thirty (30) days community service.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who falsely states he is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or presents any document that indicates he is twenty-one (21) years of age or older for the purpose of purchasing or possessing any light wine or beer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and a sentence to not more than thirty (30) days community service.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 67-3-54, any person who knowingly purchases light wine or beer for, or gives light wine or beer to a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and a sentence to not more than thirty (30) days community service. The punishment provided under this subsection shall not be applicable to violations of Section 97-5-49.

The term “community service” as used in this section shall mean work, projects or services for the benefit of the community assigned, supervised and recorded by appropriate public officials.

If a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is convicted or enters a plea of guilty of violating subsection (1) or subsection (2) of this section, the trial judge, in lieu of the penalties otherwise provided under this section, shall suspend the minor’s driver’s license by taking and keeping it in the custody of the court for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days. The judge so ordering the suspension shall enter upon his docket “DEFENDANT’S DRIVER’S LICENSE SUSPENDED FOR_______________DAYS IN LIEU OF CONVICTION” and such action by the trial judge shall not constitute a conviction. During the period that the minor’s driver’s license is suspended, the trial judge shall suspend the imposition of any fines or penalties that may be imposed under this section and may place the minor on probation subject to such conditions as the judge deems appropriate. If the minor violates any of the conditions of probation, then the trial judge shall return the driver’s license to the minor and impose the fines, penalties, or both, that he would have otherwise imposed, and such action shall constitute a conviction.

Any person who has been charged with a violation of subsections (1) or (2) of this section may, not sooner than one (1) year after the dismissal and discharge or completion of any sentence and/or payment of any fine, apply to the court for an order to expunge from all official records all recordation relating to his arrest, trial, finding or plea of guilty, and dismissal and discharge. If the court determines that such person was dismissed and the proceedings against him discharged or that such person had satisfactorily served his sentence and/or paid his fine, it shall enter such order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 431, § 3; Laws 2002, ch. 570, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch 472, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 67-3-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1979, ch. 365, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

[Codes, Hutchison’s 1848, ch. 11, art. 2(18); 1857, ch. 20, art. 13; 1871, § 2464; 1880, § 1108; 1892, § 1589; 1906, § 1743; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2085; 1930, § 1973; 1942, § 2612; Laws, 1908, ch. 115]